Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201614-607
Police officer;
reports; duties.

It shall be the duty of police officers to make a daily report to the
chief of police of the time of lighting and extinguishing of all public lights
and lamps upon their beats, and also any lamps that may be broken or out of
repair. They shall also report to the same office any defect in any sidewalk,
street, alley, or
other public highway or the existence of ice or dangerous obstructions on
the walks or streets, or break in any sewer, or disagreeable odors emanating
from inlets to sewers, or any violation of the health laws or ordinances of
the city. Suitable blanks for making such reports shall be furnished to the
chief of police by the city electrician and health commissioner. Such reports
shall be by the chief of police transmitted to the proper officers of the
city. In case of any violation of laws or ordinances the police
officer making report shall report the facts to the appropriate prosecuting authority. They
shall also perform such other duties as may be required by ordinance.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 7, p. 497;

C.S.1922, § 3688;

C.S.1929, § 14-607;

R.S.1943, § 14-607;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 1.